Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2001.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 24 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 67INCARCERATED STUDENTSSec.6701. Definitions.6702. State grant eligibility for incarcerated students.6703. Reporting.§ 6701. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agency." The Pennsylvania Higher Education Assistance 123456789101112131415161718 Agency."Eligible prison education program." A postsecondary education program that:(1) is offered by a Federal or State correctional facility;(2) leads to a degree or industry-recognized credential;(3) is:(i) accredited by a recognized accrediting agency;(ii) in the process of obtaining accreditation; or(iii) approved by the Department of Education or the Department of Corrections as meeting standards established by the departments;(4) is offered within the correctional facility or through secure, authorized remote instruction; and(5) has been approved by the Federal Bureau of Prisons or the Department of Corrections, as applicable."Incarcerated student." An individual who is confined in a Federal or State correctional facility who is enrolled in an eligible prison education program and is otherwise eligible for financial aid under State law."Recognized accrediting agency." An accrediting agency that is recognized by the United States Department of Education or the Council for Higher Education Accreditation."State grant." Financial aid provided by the agency under any State-administered higher education grant or scholarship program, including, but not limited to, the Pennsylvania State Grant Program.§ 6702. State grant eligibility for incarcerated students.(a) Eligibility authorized.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law or regulation to the contrary, including 20250HB2001PN2548 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section 8.2 of the act of January 25, 1966 (1965 P.L.1546, No.541), referred to as the Higher Education Scholarship Law, an incarcerated student may not be deemed ineligible for a State grant solely on the basis of incarceration.(b) Conditions.--Eligibility under this section shall apply to an incarcerated student who:(1) is within five years of a scheduled release date;(2) has been a resident of this Commonwealth for a period of not less than 12 months prior to the date of incarceration;(3) is enrolled in an eligible prison education program;(4) is determined by the Federal Bureau of Prisons or the Department of Corrections to be in good academic and disciplinary standing; and(5) notwithstanding section 4(a)(4) of the Higher Education Scholarship Law, meets all other eligibility requirements applicable to nonincarcerated applicants under agency rules and regulations.(c) Prohibition.--A regulation, policy or internal procedure may not be adopted or enforced that restricts eligibility for State grants on the basis of incarceration alone.(d) Construction.--This chapter shall be broadly construed to ensure access to State grant aid for incarcerated students. No provision of statute or regulation may be interpreted to impose ineligibility for State grants on the basis of incarceration except as explicitly authorized under this chapter.§ 6703. Reporting.(a) Data collection.--The Department of Corrections, in conjunction with the agency, shall collect and maintain data on 20250HB2001PN2548 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 incarcerated students who receive State grants. The data shall include, but not be limited to:(1) Enrollment and completion rates of eligible prison education programs.(2) Types of degrees or credentials earned.(3) Academic progress, including course completion and grades, as available.(4) Employment and continuing education status within one year of release, to the extent available.(5) Recidivism rates among formerly incarcerated students who received State grants.(b) Annual report.--No later than August 1 of each year, the Department of Corrections, in conjunction with the agency, shall submit a joint report to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the Senate, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the House of Representatives. The report shall include the data collected under subsection (a).Section 2. The provisions of 22 Pa. Code § 121.6(b) are abrogated.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2001PN2548 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324